Florida, session 2026, SB100.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 16 17 Section 1.âSection 11.2421, Florida Statutes, is amended to 18 read: 19 11.2421âFlorida Statutes 2026 2025 adopted.âThe 20 accompanying revision, consolidation, and compilation of the 21 public statutes of 2025 2024 of a general and permanent nature, 22 excepting tables, rules, indexes, and other related matter 23 contained therein, prepared by the Office of Legislative 24 Services under the provisions of s. 11.242, together with 25 corrections, changes, and amendments to and repeals of 26 provisions of Florida Statutes 2025 2024 enacted in additional 27 reviserâs bill or bills by the 2026 2025 Legislature, is adopted 28 and enacted as the official statute law of the state under the 29 title of âFlorida Statutes 2026 2025â and shall take effect 30 immediately upon publication. Said statutes may be cited as 31 âFlorida Statutes 2026 2025,â âFlorida Statutes,â or âF.S. 2026 32 2025.â 33 Section 2.âSection 11.2422, Florida Statutes, is amended to 34 read: 35 11.2422âStatutes repealed.âEvery statute of a general and 36 permanent nature enacted by the State or by the Territory of 37 Florida at or prior to the 2025 2024 regular legislative 38 session, and every part of such statute, not included in Florida 39 Statutes 2026 2025, as adopted by s. 11.2421, as amended, or 40 recognized and continued in force by reference therein or in ss. 41 11.2423 and 11.2424, as amended, is repealed. 42 Section 3.âSection 11.2424, Florida Statutes, is amended to 43 read: 44 11.2424âLaws not repealed.âLaws enacted after the 2025 2024 45 regular session are not repealed by the adoption and enactment 46 of the Florida Statutes 2026 2025 by s. 11.2421, as amended, but 47 shall have full effect as if enacted after its said adoption and 48 enactment. 49 Section 4.âSection 11.2425, Florida Statutes, is amended to 50 read: 51 11.2425âRights reserved under repealed statutes.âThe repeal 52 of any statute by the adoption and enactment of Florida Statutes 53 2026 2025, by s. 11.2421, as amended, shall not affect any right 54 accrued before such repeal or any civil remedy where a suit is 55 pending. 56 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect on the 60th day after 57 adjournment sine die of the session of the Legislature in which 58 enacted.